Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 3. Virginia Center for Coal and Energy Research.

§ 23.1-2623.
Virginia Center for Coal and Energy Research established.

The Virginia Center for Coal and Energy Research (the Center) is established as an interdisciplinary study, research, information, and resource facility for the Commonwealth and shall utilize the full capabilities of faculty, staff, libraries, and laboratories for the benefit of Virginians and the expansion of knowledge pertaining to coal and energy research and development. The Center shall be located at the University.

History.

1977, c. 543, §§ 23-135.7:1, 23-135.7:2; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2624.
Control and supervision.

The Center is subject to the control and supervision of the board.

History.

1977, c. 543, § 23-135.7:3; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2625.
Executive director.

The board shall appoint an executive director for the Center who, subject to the approval of the board, shall:

Exercise all powers and perform all duties imposed upon him by law;

Carry out the specific duties imposed upon him by the board; and

Employ such personnel and contract for such services as may be required to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

1977, c. 543, §§ 23-135.7:4, 23-135.7:5; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2626.
Powers and duties of the Center.

The Center, under the direction of the executive director, shall:

Develop a degree program in energy production and conservation research at the master’s level in conjunction with the Council;

Develop and provide programs of continuing education and in-service training for persons who work in the fields of coal or other energy research, development, or production;

Collaborate with other departments of the University, including the Department of Mining and Minerals Engineering;

Conduct research in the fields of coal, coal utilization, migrating natural gases such as methane and propane, and other energy-related work;

Collect and maintain data on energy production, development, and utilization;

Foster the utilization of research information, discoveries, and data;

Coordinate the functions of the Center with each of the Center’s energy research facilities to prevent duplication of effort;

Apply for and accept grants from the federal government, state government, and any other source to carry out the purposes of this article. The Center may comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary to accept such grants;

Accept gifts, bequests, and any other thing of value to carry out the purposes of this article;

Receive, administer, and expend all funds and other assistance made available to the Center to carry out the purposes of this article;

Consult with the Division of Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency of the Department of Energy in the preparation of the Virginia Energy Plan pursuant to §

45.2-1710

; and

Do all things necessary or convenient for the proper administration of this article.

History.

1977, c. 543, § 23-135.7:6; 2006, c. 939; 2016, c. 588; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2021, “ §

45.2-1710

” was substituted for “ § 67-201” to conform to Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, in subdivision 11, substituted “Division of Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency” for “Division of Energy” and “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

§ 23.1-2627.
Virginia Coal Research and Development Advisory Board.

The Virginia Coal Research and Development Advisory Board (the Advisory Board) shall serve in an advisory capacity to the executive director of the Center. Representatives to the Advisory Board shall be appointed by the board. The board shall appoint such other individuals as it deems necessary to the work of the Advisory Board.

Members shall include representatives from the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity, the Department of Energy, the Department of Labor and Industry, the Virginia Port Authority, and each public institution of higher education, excluding the University.

History.

1977, c. 543, § 23-135.7:7; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 448; 1996, cc. 589, 599; 2013, c. 482; 2016, c. 588; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in the second paragraph.